Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.681

Enforcement—Committee subpoena—Refusal to testify.

In case of the failure on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued in [on] behalf of the rules review committee, or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it is the duty of the superior court of any county, or of the judge thereof, on application of the committee, to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify in the court.

[ 1995 c 403 s 507.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.